dictsource/vi_rules
// replace combining (tone) accents with single characters
.replace
à	à
á	á
ả	ả
ã	ã
ạ	ạ


ằ	ằ
ắ	ắ
ẳ	ẳ
ẵ	ẵ
ặ	ặ

ầ	ầ
ấ	ấ
ẩ	ẩ
ẫ	ẫ
ậ	ậ

è	è
é	é
ẻ	ẻ
ẽ	ẽ
ẹ	ẹ

ề	ề
ế	ế
ể	ể
ễ	ễ
ệ	ệ

ì	ì
í	í
ỉ	ỉ
ĩ	ĩ
ị	ị

ò	ò
ó	ó
ỏ	ỏ
õ	õ
ọ	ọ

ồ	ồ
ố	ố
ổ	ổ
ỗ	ỗ
ộ	ộ

ờ	ờ
ớ	ớ
ở	ở
ỡ	ỡ
ợ	ợ

ù	ù
ú	ú
ủ	ủ
ũ	ũ
ụ	ụ

ừ	ừ
ứ	ứ
ử	ử
ữ	ữ
ự	ự

ỳ	ỳ
ý	ý
ỷ	ỷ
ỹ	ỹ
ỵ	ỵ

ð	đ  // Ð U+0d0
ɖ	đ  // Ɖ U+189

//================================
//  Consonants
//================================
.L01 t c ne nd k x s nt ch th me te le ce ny ry e o u re nch de p pe ph sh v ve ge r
.L02 n a
.L03 ch nh
.L04 a u ă â o ô á à ả ã ạ ù ú ủ ũ ụ ắ ằ ẳ ẵ ặ ấ ầ ẩ ẫ ậ ó ò ỏ õ ọ ố ồ ổ ỗ ộ ư ứ ừ ử ữ ự ơ ớ ờ ở ỡ ợ
.L05 o ó ò ỏ õ ọ ô ố ồ ộ ỗ ổ

.group b
        b          b
     _) b          _b
//b($w_alt2 _^_EN
        
 

.group c
        c          k         //k
        c (C       _^_EN
        c (_       c
     _) ch         tS       // try [tS;] [tS] [c] c     
?2   _) ch         c
?1   _) ch         c         
        ch (_      c         
        ce (_      _^_EN
     _) cl         _^_EN
	    // c (L05			kh
    		
 
 

.group d
        d          z         // try [z] [J] [dZ] [dZ;] [J^]
?2      d          J^
?1      d          J^
        
 
        d (_       _^_EN
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group đ
      //  đ          d
     _) đ          d_
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group f
        //f          f
     _) f          _^_EN
        f (_       _^_EN
        
 
        
 

.group g
        g (L04     Q         // try [g] [Q]
        gh         Q         // or [g]  [Q]
        gi         z         // try [D] [z] [j] [J^] [z;] [J] [dZ]
        g (ì       z
        g (í       z
        g (ỉ       z
        g (ĩ       z
        g (ị       z
     _) g          _^_EN
?1      g (ì       J^
?1      g (í       J^
?1      g (ỉ       J^
?1      g (ĩ       J^
?1      g (ị       J^        
        
 
?2      g (ì       J^
?2      g (í       J^
?2      g (ỉ       J^
?2      g (ĩ       J^
?2      g (ị       J^        
        
 
?1      gi         J^
?2      gi         J^        
?1      giết       J^'iE3g
?2      giết       J^'iE3g
?1      giếng      J^'iE3N
?1      giềng      J^'iE2N
?2      giếng      J^'iE3N
?1      giêng      J^'iE1N
?2      giêng      J^'iE1N
?2      giềng      J^'iE2N
        giết       z'iE3t[
        giếc       z'iE3kh
        giêng      z'iE1N
        giềng      z'iE2N
        giếng      z'iE3N
        giểng      z'iE4N
        giễng      z'iE5N
        giệng      z'iE6N
        
 
?1      giệt       J^'iE6g
        giệt       z'iE6t[
        giệc       z'iE6kh
     _) gol        _^_EN
     _) gat        _^_EN     
        ght (_     _^_EN     
        
 
        
 

.group h
        h          h
?2      hu         w         
        
 

.group j
        j          Z
        
 
        
 

.group k
     _) k          k
     _) kh         x
        //kh         x
        k (_       _^_EN
        
 
        
 

.group l
        l          l
        l (_       _^_EN
     C) le         _^_EN
	   //le (A      _^_EN 
        
 
        
 

.group m
        m          m
        
 
        
 

.group n
        n          n
?1      n (_       N         //n
?2      n (_       N
        ng         N
        ngh        N
        nh         n^
?2 L02) nh         n         
        nd (_      _^_EN
        
 
        
 

.group ñ
        ñ          n^
        
 
        
 

.group p
        p (C       _^_EN
        p          p         
        ph         f
        
 
        
 

.group q
        q          k
        q (_       k
		qu         kw         //kw
		quô         ku@
        quồ         ku@2
        quố         ku@3
        quổ         ku@4
        quỗ         ku@5
        quộ         ku@6
        
 
        
 

.group r
        r          z         // try [z] [z.] [r] [z;]
?2      r          Q         
?1      r          z.        
        r (_       _^_EN
        rm (_      _^_EN
        
 
        
 

.group s
        s          s       // try [s.] [s] [S]
        
 
     _) sh         _^_EN
        s (_       _^_EN
        st (_      _^_EN
        
 
        
 

.group t
        t          t[
?1      t (_       kh
?2      t (_       kh        
        th         t
        tr         tS        //cr        // try [cr] [tr] [tS;] [tS] [c] [dZ] [dz;]
?1      tr         cr        
?2      tr         c         
        ts (_      _^_EN
        th (_      _^_EN
        tt (_      _^_EN
        
 
        
 

.group v
        v          v
?2      v          J^        
        ve (A      _^_EN     
        
 
        
 

.group w
        w          w
     _) w          _^_EN
        w (_       _^_EN
        
 
        
 

.group x
        x          s
        x (_       _^_EN
        
 
        
 

.group z
        z          z
        z (_       _^_EN
        
 
        
 
//================================
//  Vowels
//================================
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group a
        a          a:
        ai         a:j
        aì         a:j2
        aí         a:j3
        aỉ         a:j4
        aĩ         a:j5
        aị         a:j6
        ay         aj
?2      ay         a:I       
        
 
        
 
        aý         aj3
        aỷ         aj4
        aỹ         aj5
        aỵ         aj6
        ao         a:w
        aò         a:w2
        aó         a:w3
        aỏ         a:w4
        aõ         a:w5
        aọ         a:w6
        au         aw
?2      au         a:U
        aù         aw2
        aú         aw3
        aủ         aw4
        aũ         aw5
        aụ         aw6
        a (L01     _^_EN
        ai (L02    _^_EN
        a (@       _^_EN
        a (L03     e-
 

.group à
        à          a:2
        ài         a:j2
        ày         aj2
?2      ày         a:I2
        à (L03     e-2
 
        
 
        
 
        
 
        ào         a:w2
        àu         aw2
?2      àu         a:U2
        
 

.group á
        á          a:3
        ái         a:j3
        áy         aj3
        áo         a:w3
        áu         aw3
?2      áu         a:U3      
?2      áy         a:I3
		á (L03     e-3
		
.group ả
        ả          a:4
        ải         a:j4
        ảy         aj4
        ảo         a:w4
        ảu         aw4
?2      ảu         a:U4      
?2      ảy         a:I4      
		ả (L03     e-4

.group ã
        ã          a:5
        ãi         a:j5
        ãy         aj5
        ão         a:w5
        ãu         aw5
?2      ãu         a:U5      
?2      ãy         a:I5
		ã (L03     e-5

.group ạ
        ạ          a:6
        ại         a:j6
        ạy         aj6
        ạo         a:w6
        ạu         aw6
?2      ạu         a:U6      
?2      ạy         a:I6      
		ạ (L03     e-6
        
 
//================================
.group ă
        ă          a
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ằ
        ằ          a2
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ắ
        ắ          a3
        ắk          a3c
 
        
 
        
 

.group ẳ
        ẳ          a4
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ẵ
        ẵ          a5
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ặ
        ặ          a6
        
 
        
 
//=================================
.group â
        â          @
        ây         @I
        âu         @U1       
?2      â (L03     a         
?1      â (L03     a         
        
 
        
 

.group ầ
        ầ          @2
        ầy         @I2
        ầu         @U2
?2      ầ (L03     a2        
?1      ầ (L03     a2        
        
 
        
 

.group ấ
        ấ          @3
        ấy         @I3
        ấu         @U3
?2      ấ (L03     a3        
?1      ấ (L03     a3        
        
 
        
 

.group ẩ
        ẩ          @4
        ẩy         @I4
        ẩu         @U4
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ẫ
        ẫ          @5
        ẫy         @I5
        ẫu         @U5
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ậ
        ậ          @6
        ậy         @I6
        ậu         @U6
?2      ậ (L03     a6        
?1      ậ (L03     a6        
        
 
//===========================
.group e
        e          E
        eo         EU
        eò         EU2
        eó         EU3
        eỏ         EU4
        eỗ         EU5
        eọ         EU6
        e (L01     _^_EN
        ey (_      _^_EN
        e (@       _^_EN     
        
 

.group è
        è          E2
        èo         EU2
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group é
        é          E3
        éo         EU3
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ẻ
        ẻ          E4
        ẻo         EU4
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ẽ
        ẽ          E5
        ẽo         EU5
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ẹ
        ẹ          E6
        ẹo         EU6
        
 
        
 
//============================
        
 

.group ê
        ê          e
        êu         eU1
?2      ê (L03     @:        
?2      ê (L02     @:        
        
 

.group ề
        ề          e2
        ều         eU2
?2      ề (L03     @:2       
?2      ề (L02     @:2
        
 

.group ế
        ế          e3
        ếu         eU3
        
 
?2      ế (L03     @:3
?2      ế (L02     @:3

.group ể
        ể          e4
        ểu         eU4
?2      ể (L03     @:4       
?2      ể (L02     @:4       
        
 

.group ễ
        ễ          e5
        ễu         eU5
?2      ễ (L03     @:5       
?2      ễ (L02     @:5
        
 

.group ệ
        ệ          e6
        ệu         eU6
?2      ệ (L03     @:6
?2      ệ (L02     @:6
        
 
//============================
        
 

.group i
        i          i
        //i (A       j
        ia         i@
        ià         i@2
        iá         i@3
        iả         i@4
        iã         i@5
        iạ         i@6
        iê         iE
        iề         iE2
        iế         iE3
        iể         iE4
        iễ         iE5
        iệ         iE6
        iu         iU
        iù         iU2
        iú         iU3
        iủ         iU4
        iũ         iU5
        iụ         iU6
        iêu        iEw
        iều        iEw2
        iếu        iEw3
        iểu        iEw4
        iễu        iEw5
        iệu        iEw6
        i (L01     _^_EN
        i (@       _^_EN
?2      i (L03     @         
?1      i (L03     @
?2      i (L02     @         

.group ì
        ì          i2
        ì (A       j2
        ìa         i@2
        ìu         iU2
?2      ì (L03     @2        
?1      ì (L03     @2        
?2      ì (L02     @2

.group í
        í          i3
        í (A       j3
        ía         i@3
        íu         iU3
?2      í (L03     @3        
?1      í (L03     @3
?2      í (L02     @3

.group ỉ
        ỉ          i4
        ỉ (A       j4
        ỉa         i@4
        ỉu         iU4
?2      ỉ (L03     @4        
?1      ỉ (L03     @4
?2      ỉ (L02     @4        
        
 

.group ĩ
        ĩ          i5
        ĩ (A       j5
        ĩa         i@5
        ĩu         iU5
?2      ĩ (L03     @5        
?1      ĩ (L03     @5
?2      ĩ (L02     @5        
        
 

.group ị
        ị          i6
        ị (A       j6
        ịa         i@6
        ịu         iU6
?2      ị (L03     @6        
?1      ị (L03     @6
?2      ị (L02     @6
        
 
//=========================
        
 
